Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-219.01
Public agency, defined.

Public agency means any:

(1) County, city, or village; school, drainage, tax, improvement, or other district; local or regional housing agency; department, division, or political subdivision of this state or another state; housing agency or housing trust of this state or another state; and other agency, bureau, office, authority, or instrumentality of this state or another state;

(2) Board, agency, commission, division, or other instrumentality of a city, village, or county; and

(3) Board, commission, agency, department, or other instrumentality of the United States, or any political subdivision or governmental unit thereof, and in each case, any affiliates thereof.

Laws 2006, LB 693, § 7.